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DTC C 1249 / 49 Stop Light Switch Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1249/49
ECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5 to 18.5VandABSis in
non−operation, theopen instop lightswitchcircuit contin-
ues for 0.3 secs. or more.

SStop lightswitchcircuit
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*1:LiftgateType
*2: Swing Type
*3: 1HZ, 1HD−T
*4: Except *3
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*1:Europe
*2: Australia, General
*3: Swing Type
*4: Liftgate Type
*5: 1HZBenchType
*6: Except *5
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of the stop light switch.

CHECK:
Check that the stop light lights up when brake pedal is depressed and turns OFF when the brake pedal is
released.

OK Go to step 3.

NG

2 Check stop light circuit (See page BE−58).

NG Repair or replace stop light circuit.

OK

3 Check voltage between terminal STP of ABS ECU and body ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS ECU with connectors still connected.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminal STP of ABS ECU and body
ground when brake pedal is depressed.
OK:

Voltage:8 − 14 V

NG Go to step 4

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.
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4 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between and stop light switch
and ABS ECU (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS ECU.


